Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1513
Candidate filing form; nominating petitions; prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person who (1) offers to accept and receive or accepts and receives any money or valuable thing in consideration for his or her filing or agreeing to file or not filing or agreeing not to file a candidate filing form for himself or herself as a candidate for nomination in any primary election, (2) offers to accept or receives any money or any valuable thing in consideration for withdrawing his or her name as a candidate for nomination at a primary election, (3) offers or, with knowledge of the same, permits any person to offer for his or her benefit any bribe to a voter to induce him or her to sign any candidate filing form or accept any such bribe or promise of gain of any kind in the nature of a bribe as a consideration for signing the same whether such bribe or promise of gain in the nature of a bribe is offered or accepted before or after such signing, or (4) signs more petitions for nomination than there are positions to fill in any kind of office shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 412.